District of Columbia statutes.
50-2652

Rules.

(a)

Within 120 days of October 22, 2009, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-66, § 3, 56 DCR 6608
Delegation of Rulemaking Authority under the Commercial Curbside Loading Zone Implementation Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2010-63, April 23, 2010 ( 57 DCR 3511).
This section is referenced in § 50-2651.